District of Columbia statutes.
22-4331

Penalties; prosecutions.

(a)

Any person convicted of violating any provision of this chapter, or any regulation made pursuant to this chapter, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

(b)

Prosecutions for violations of this chapter, or the regulations made pursuant thereto, shall be conducted in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any Assistant Corporation Counsel.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 4
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 11(a), 41 DCR 1639
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 238, 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1631.
1973 Ed., § 22-1631.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $300” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 238 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.